Wisconsin, session 2025, AB438.
do enact as follows:AB438,11Section 1. 14.835 of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,3,7214.835 PA licensure compact. There is created a PA licensure compact 3commission as specified in s. 448.988. The delegate on the commission 4representing this state shall be appointed by the physician assistant associate 5affiliated credentialing board as provided in s. 448.988 (7) (b) 1. and shall be an 6individual described in s. 448.988 (7) (b) 2. a. or b. The commission has the powers 7and duties granted and imposed under s. 448.988.AB438,28Section 2. 15.085 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,3,13915.085 (1m) (b) The public members of the podiatry affiliated credentialing 10board, the occupational therapists affiliated credentialing board, the physician 11assistant associate affiliated credentialing board, and the genetic counselors 12affiliated credentialing board shall not be engaged in any profession or occupation 13concerned with the delivery of physical or mental health care.AB438,314Section 3. 15.406 (7) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,3,191515.406 (7) Physician assistant associate affiliated credentialing 16board. (intro.) There is created in the department of safety and professional 17services, attached to the medical examining board, a physician assistant associate 18affiliated credentialing board consisting of the following members appointed for 19staggered 4-year terms:AB438,420Section 4. 50.39 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,4,82150.39 (3) Facilities governed by ss. 45.50, 48.62, 49.70, 49.72, 50.02, 51.09, 22and 252.10, juvenile correctional facilities as defined in s. 938.02 (10p), correctional 1institutions governed by the department of corrections under s. 301.02, and the 2offices and clinics of persons licensed to treat the sick under chs. 446, 447, and 448 3are exempt from ss. 50.32 to 50.39. Sections 50.32 to 50.39 do not abridge the rights 4of the medical examining board, physician assistant associate affiliated 5credentialing board, physical therapy examining board, podiatry affiliated 6credentialing board, dentistry examining board, pharmacy examining board, 7chiropractic examining board, and board of nursing in carrying out their statutory 8duties and responsibilities.AB438,59Section 5. 111.335 (4) (jm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,4,1310111.335 (4) (jm) Notwithstanding s. 111.322, it is not employment 11discrimination because of conviction record for the physician assistant associate 12affiliated credentialing board to refuse to grant to an individual a compact 13privilege, as defined in s. 448.988 (2) (b), in accordance with s. 448.988 (4) (a) 3.AB438,614Section 6. 180.1901 (1m) (bd) of the statutes is created to read:AB438,4,1615180.1901 (1m) (bd) Physician associate affiliated credentialing board under 16subch. IX of ch. 448.AB438,717Section 7. 440.035 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,4,2318440.035 (2m) (b) The medical examining board, the physician assistant 19associate affiliated credentialing board, the podiatry affiliated credentialing board, 20the board of nursing, the dentistry examining board, or the optometry examining 21board may issue guidelines regarding best practices in prescribing controlled 22substances for persons credentialed by that board who are authorized to prescribe 23controlled substances.AB438,824Section 8. 440.035 (2m) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,5,51440.035 (2m) (c) 1. (intro.) The medical examining board, the physician 2assistant associate affiliated credentialing board, the podiatry affiliated 3credentialing board, the board of nursing, the dentistry examining board, and the 4optometry examining board shall, by November 1 of each year, submit a report to 5the persons specified in subd. 2. that does all of the following:AB438,96Section 9. Subchapter IX (title) of chapter 448 [precedes 448.971] of the 7statutes is amended to read:AB438,5,88CHAPTER 448AB438,5,119SUBCHAPTER IX10PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT ASSOCIATE11AFFILIATED CREDENTIALING BOARDAB438,1012Section 10. 448.971 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,5,1413448.971 (1) “Board” means the physician assistant associate affiliated 14credentialing board.AB438,1115Section 11. 448.971 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,5,1716448.971 (2) “Physician assistant associate” means a person who is licensed 17under this subchapter or who holds a compact privilege.AB438,1218Section 12. 448.972 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,6,219448.972 (1) Except as provided in subs. (2) and (3), no person may represent 20himself or herself as a “PA” or,” “physician assistant,” or “physician associate,” use 21or assume the title “PA” or,” “physician assistant,” or “physician associate,” or 22append to the person’s name the words or letters “physician assistant,” “physician 23associate,” “PA,” “PA-C,” or any other titles, letters, or designation that represents 1or may tend to represent the person as a physician assistant associate, unless he or 2she is licensed by the board under this subchapter or holds a compact privilege.AB438,133Section 13. 448.972 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,6,64448.972 (3) A student who is enrolled in an accredited physician assistant 5associate educational program may use the title “physician assistant student,” 6“physician associate student,” “PA student,” or “PA-S.”AB438,147Section 14. 448.9723 of the statutes is created to read:AB438,6,148448.9723 Use of titles. (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), no person licensed 9or granted a compact privilege under this subchapter may use, assume, or append 10to his or her name any title that is not granted under this subchapter unless the 11person holds another credential, as defined in s. 440.01 (2) (a), that entitles the 12person to use, assume, or append to his or her name the title or the person is 13permitted to use, assume, or append to his or her name the title under any law of 14this state.AB438,6,2215(2) (a) Subsection (1) does not prohibit a person who holds a doctorate degree 16from using, assuming, or appending to his or her name the title “doctor” or any 17other words, letters, or abbreviations that represent that the person holds that 18degree or the field in which the degree was received. If a person to whom this 19paragraph applies uses, assumes, or appends to his or her name the title “doctor,” 20the person shall also use, assume, or append to his or her name words, letters, or 21abbreviations that represent the field in which the person received the doctorate 22degree.AB438,7,223(b) Subsection (1) does not prohibit a person who holds a bachelor’s degree or 24master’s degree from using, assuming, or appending to his or her name any words, 1letters, or abbreviations that represent that the person holds the degree or the field 2in which the degree was received.AB438,153Section 15. 448.9725 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,7,154448.9725 (2) Notwithstanding the requirements of s. 448.9785, a physician 5assistant associate may provide expedited partner therapy if a patient is diagnosed 6as infected with a chlamydial infection, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis and the 7patient has had sexual contact with a sexual partner during which the chlamydial 8infection, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis may have been transmitted to or from the 9sexual partner. The physician assistant associate shall attempt to obtain the name 10of the patient’s sexual partner. A prescription order for an antimicrobial drug 11prepared under this subsection shall include the name and address of the patient’s 12sexual partner, if known. If the physician assistant associate is unable to obtain the 13name of the patient’s sexual partner, the prescription order shall include, in 14ordinary, bold-faced capital letters, the words, “expedited partner therapy” or the 15letters “EPT.”AB438,1616Section 16. 448.9725 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,7,2017448.9725 (3) The physician assistant associate shall provide the patient with 18a copy of the information sheet prepared by the department of health services under 19s. 46.03 (44) and shall request that the patient give the information sheet to the 20person with whom the patient had sexual contact.AB438,1721Section 17. 448.9725 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,8,222448.9725 (4) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), a physician assistant associate 23is immune from civil liability for injury to or the death of a person who takes any 24antimicrobial drug if the antimicrobial drug is prescribed, dispensed, or furnished 1under this section and if expedited partner therapy is provided as specified under 2this section.AB438,183Section 18. 448.9725 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,8,74448.9725 (4) (b) The immunity under par. (a) does not extend to the donation, 5distribution, furnishing, or dispensing of an antimicrobial drug by a physician 6assistant associate whose act or omission involves reckless, wanton, or intentional 7misconduct.AB438,198Section 19. 448.9727 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB438,8,109448.9727 (2) (a) (intro.) A physician assistant associate may do any of the 10following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab438 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab438 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB438 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB438 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB438: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting